New York, session 2025-2026, A3196.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. The commissioner, in consultation with the office for people with 4 developmental disabilities, shall promulgate rules and regulations 5 requiring every high school guidance counselor to receive training and 6 instruction relating to understanding the special needs of high school 7 students with autism spectrum disorder and assisting such students with 8 the transition to higher education or employment. Such training and 9 instruction may be included with any other training and instruction 10 required pursuant to this chapter and shall be provided at least once 11 per year or more frequently as determined by the commissioner in consul- 12 tation with the office for people with developmental disabilities. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 15 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 16 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 17 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06272-01-5